Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-421
Act, exceptions.

The
provisions of sections 28-419 to 28-424 shall not apply to the use or sale
of such substances, as defined in sections 28-419 and 28-420, when such use
or sale is administered or prescribed for medical or dental purposes, nor
shall the provisions of sections 28-419 to 28-424 apply to the use or sale
of alcoholic liquors as defined by section 53-103.02.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 81;

Laws 2010, LB861, § 5.